Hawaii statutes.
§352-16 Establishment of work release.
(a) The director, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the
director, may establish a work release plan for persons who are committed to
the director's care and who are receiving care and treatment in a youth
correctional facility; provided that such a plan shall not interfere with any
educational program in which such persons may be enrolled.

(b) Under such a work release plan, any such
person may be authorized to secure or continue in suitable employment outside
of such youth correctional facility, and unless otherwise authorized by the
department with respect to specific cases, return to and remain in such
facility during non-working hours.

(c) Employment under such a work release plan
may be at a wage less than the minimum wage authorized in chapter 387; provided
that no more than five hours of a person's workweek shall be paid at wages less
than the minimum wage.

(d) It shall be the duty of the employer of a
person participating in a work release plan to transmit to the director the
earnings of such persons. The transmission to the director of the earnings of
such person shall operate to discharge such employer from any further
obligation to such person except with respect to any taxes lawfully withheld
from the wages of such person.

(e) The earnings transmitted to the director
by a person's employer under a work release plan shall be held to the account
of such person. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1); am L 1981, c 224, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next